Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-686
Certification of levy.

The Property Tax Administrator, on or before January 15 of each year, shall certify to the State Treasurer the names of the car line companies and the several amounts of taxes levied under section 77-684.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 71;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 211;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 81;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 9.